test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-nuulj23_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nuuĺ: # Noun (23) nuuĺ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Nom: nuuĺ
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Gen: noolõ
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Par: nuult
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Ill: nuuldõ
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Ine: [noolõn, noolõh, noolõhn]
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Ela: noolõst
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+All: noolõlõ
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Ade: noolõl
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Abl: noolõlt
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Tra: noolõs
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Ter: noolõniq
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Abe: noolõldaq
     nuuĺ+N+Sg+Com: noolõgaq
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Nom: noolõq
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Gen: [nuuli, nooltõ]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Par: nuuli
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Ill: [nuulihe, nuuli, nuulidõ]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Ine: [noolin, noolih, noolihn, nooltõn, nooltõh, nooltõhn]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Ela: [noolist, nooltõst]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+All: [noolilõ, nooltõlõ]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Ade: [noolil, nooltõl]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Abl: [noolilt, nooltõlt]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Tra: [noolis, nooltõs]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Ter: [nooliniq, nooltõniq]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Abe: [noolildaq, nooltõldaq]
     nuuĺ+N+Pl+Com: [nuuligaq, nooltõgaq]
